Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1316
Railroad crossing accident; notice to department; when.

When an accident occurs at any railroad crossing within the State of Nebraska which results in serious personal injury or loss of human life, the corporation operating the railroad which was involved in the accident shall within one day thereafter notify the department that an accident has occurred and shall promptly furnish to the department a copy of the same notice that it is required to furnish to the Nebraska Public Service Commission and the Federal Railroad Administration.

Laws 1979, LB 42, § 7.